Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.080

Examination—Issuance and display of license.

The examination shall determine whether the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles governing the practice of a dispensing optician which is hereby declared necessary for the protection of the public health. The examining committee may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities. The secretary shall license successful examinees and the license shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

[ 1995 c 198 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 77; 1957 c 43 s 8.]